Illinois, session 104th, HB3086.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Veteran Service Organizations State Charter 5Act is amended by changing the title of the Act and Sections 1, 65, 10, 15, 20, 25, 30, 35, 40, 45, and 50 as follows: 7    (330 ILCS 46/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Veteran 9Service Organizations Equal State Charter Act.10(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.) 11    (330 ILCS 46/5)12    Sec. 5. Veteran service organization status State charter. 13A veteran service organization shall be considered to have 14veteran service organization status state chartered when the 15organization meets all of the requirements listed in this Act 16and the organization's application for veteran service 17organization state charter status has been approved by the 18Attorney General. Upon approval, the Attorney General shall 19issue a letter granting veteran service organization state 20charter status to the organization.21(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB3086- 2 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1    (330 ILCS 46/10)2    Sec. 10. Granting of veteran service organization state 3charter status. The Attorney General shall grant veteran 4service organization state charter status to any organization 5that has demonstrated that all requirements for obtaining 6veteran service organization state charter status have been 7met. 8(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.) 9    (330 ILCS 46/15)10    Sec. 15. Veteran service organization State charter 11requirements. To qualify for veteran service organization 12state charter status, a veteran service organization must:13        (1)(A) Have been formed by and for veterans, have a 14    board where a majority of its members are veterans, and 15    have annual expenditures that demonstrate that 20% a 16    majority of the organization's expenses reflect support 17    for veterans; or (B) have a paid membership of at least 15 18    individuals and be associated with a congressionally 19    chartered organization.20        (2) Possess tax-exempt status from the Internal 21    Revenue Service either under Section 501(c)(3) or Section 22    501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code and have the 23    primary charitable purpose of providing service or 24    assistance to veterans, their spouses, or their 25    dependents.   HB3086- 3 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1        (3) Possess a current certificate of good standing as 2    an Illinois registered not-for-profit organization from 3    the Secretary of State. 4        (4) Obtain and maintain ongoing registration and 5    compliance under the Charitable Trust Act with the 6    Charitable Trust Bureau of the Attorney General's Office 7    or substantiation for an exemption.8        (5) For organizations with veteran service officers, 9    demonstrate that each veteran service officer possesses a 10    valid U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs accreditation or 11    that such accreditation is pending. 12        (6) Comply with the methods and criteria set forth 13    under Section 9 of the Military Veterans Assistance Act if 14    the veteran service organization has delegates and 15    alternates or is in the process of selecting and 16    submitting delegates and alternates to a county Veterans 17    Assistance Commission at the time of application for 18    veteran service organization State charter status.19(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.) 20    (330 ILCS 46/20)21    Sec. 20. Application for veteran service organization 22state charter status. A veteran service organization may 23submit an application for veteran service organization state 24charter status to the Attorney General. All supporting 25documentation demonstrating that each of the requirements   HB3086- 4 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1listed in this Act have been met shall be provided with the 2application. 3(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.) 4    (330 ILCS 46/25)5    Sec. 25. Attestation of compliance. Any application for 6veteran service organization state charter status shall 7include the following statement, from the Commander, 8President, or chief executive officer: "I, on organizational 9letterhead and signed by all officers: "All officers for 10(insert lawful organizational name of the Commander, 11President, or chief executive officer) do hereby attest that 12all requirements for a veteran service organization status 13state charter have been met, that there are no past or ongoing 14enforcement actions or lawsuits against the organization or 15any of its officers for violations or suspected violations of 16the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, or 17the Military Veterans Assistance Act, and that we will notify 18the Attorney General within 30 days if, at any point, the 19organization no longer meets one or more of the requirements 20for veteran service organization state charter status." 21(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.) 22    (330 ILCS 46/30)23    Sec. 30. Denial of veteran service organization state 24charter. The Attorney General shall deny an application for   HB3086- 5 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1veteran service organization state charter status to any 2organization that does not meet all the requirements for 3veteran service organization state charter status in Section 415. Any organization whose veteran service organization state 5charter application has been denied may resubmit that 6application once all deficiencies have been corrected.7(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.) 8    (330 ILCS 46/35)9    Sec. 35. Duration of veteran service organization state 10charter status. Veteran service organization State charter 11status shall be valid for 3 years. A veteran service 12organization must reapply for veteran service organization 13state charter status at least 120 days prior to the expiration 14of its current state charter status. 15(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.) 16    (330 ILCS 46/40)17    Sec. 40. Revocation. If the Attorney General is made 18aware, either through notification as provided in Section 30 19or through other information or evidence, that an organization 20that has been granted veteran service organization state 21charter status no longer meets one or more of the requirements 22of Section 15, the Attorney General may revoke the veteran 23service organization state charter status. Nothing in this 24Section is intended to take away or limit any powers of the   HB3086- 6 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1Attorney General under common law or other statutory law, and 2the Attorney General may, in his or her sole discretion, 3request that a court revoke veteran service organization state 4charter status based on other conduct not specifically listed 5in this Section.6(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.) 7    (330 ILCS 46/45)8    Sec. 45. Publication of state chartered veteran service 9organizations. The Attorney General shall maintain a publicly 10accessible list of state chartered veteran service 11organizations that are granted status in accordance with this 12Act.13(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.) 14    (330 ILCS 46/50)15    Sec. 50. Violation; remedies. It is a violation of Section 169 of the Military Veterans Assistance Act for any person, 17group, or entity to assert veteran service organization state 18charter status where such status has not been granted in 19accordance with this Act or where such status has been 20revoked. In addition to any other remedies, a court may assess 21a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each violation of this 22Act.23(Source: P.A. 103-405, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB3086- 7 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1    Section 10. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 2Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2YYY as follows: 3    (815 ILCS 505/2YYY)4    Sec. 2YYY. Deceptive practices targeting veterans and 5military members.6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Compensation" means any money, thing of value, or 8economic benefit conferred on, or received by, any person in 9return for services rendered, or to be rendered, by himself or 10herself or another. 11    "Veteran or military benefits services" means any services 12offered or provided to a veteran, military member, or family 13member who is entitled to receive benefits under federal, 14State, or local law, policy, or practice as a result of, at 15least in part, qualifying military service. Such services 16include assistance, consulting or coaching in the preparation, 17presentation, or prosecution of claims or other attempts to 18obtain benefits, increase benefits, or appeal a decision 19related to obtaining or increasing benefits.20    "Veterans services disclosures" means providing, in upper 21case type in size at least as large as the type size of the 22written communication or by voice-over, the following 23statements: 24    "THIS BUSINESS IS NOT ENDORSED OR SPONSORED BY, OR 25AFFILIATED WITH, THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS   HB3086- 8 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1AFFAIRS OR THE ILLINOIS DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS, OR ANY 2FEDERALLY CHARTERED VA ACCREDITED VETERAN SERVICE 3ORGANIZATION. YOU MAY QUALIFY FOR OTHER VETERANS BENEFITS 4BEYOND THE BENEFITS FOR WHICH YOU ARE RECEIVING SERVICES 5HERE.". 6    "VETERAN AND MILITARY BENEFITS SERVICES ARE AVAILABLE FREE 7OF CHARGE FROM VA ACCREDITED COUNTY VETERAN SERVICE OFFICERS, 8REPRESENTATIVES OF THE ILLINOIS DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS 9AFFAIRS, AND THE VETERAN SERVICE OFFICERS OF FEDERALLY 10CHARTERED VETERAN SERVICE ORGANIZATIONS. TO LEARN MORE, 11CONTACT THESE ORGANIZATIONS OR THE ILLINOIS ATTORNEY GENERAL'S 12OFFICE AT 1-800-382-3000.".13    (b) It is an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 14Act for any person providing veteran or military benefits 15services to:16        (1) Fail in any advertising to conspicuously disclose 17    veterans services disclosures when veteran or military 18    benefits services are provided in exchange for any 19    financial compensation, benefit or thing of value.20        (2) Fail at the outset of the business relationship to 21    clearly provide, both orally and in writing, veterans 22    services disclosures when veteran or military benefits 23    services are provided in exchange for any financial 24    compensation, benefit or thing of value. 25        (3) Fail to obtain all veteran or military benefits 26    services qualifications, certifications, and   HB3086- 9 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1    accreditations required under State or federal law for the 2    services that person provides.3        (3.5) Receive compensation for referring any 4    individual to another person to advise or assist the 5    individual with any veterans' benefits matter. 6        (3.6) Guarantee, either directly or by implication, a 7    successful outcome or that any individual is certain to 8    receive specific veterans' benefits or that any individual 9    is certain to receive a specific level, percentage, or 10    amount of veterans' benefit. 11        (4) Fail, when acting as a fiduciary for a veteran 12    receiving benefits, to meet the responsibilities of 13    fiduciaries under 38 CFR 13.140.14        (5) Fail, when providing representation before the 15    United States Department of Veterans Affairs, to meet the 16    standards of conduct under 38 CFR 14.632.17        (6) Charge fees or expenses in violation of 38 CFR 18    14.636 or 14.637.19        (7) When acting as an accredited agent, attorney, or 20    representative for a veteran, charge fees or expenses in 21    violation of 38 CFR 14.636 or 14.637.22        (8) When assisting, advising, or consulting with a 23    veteran on an initial claim, receive any compensation for 24    any services rendered in connection with any claim filed 25    within the one year presumptive period of active-duty 26    release, unless the veteran acknowledges by signing a   HB3086- 10 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1    waiver that the veteran is within this period and is 2    choosing to deny any available free services.3        (9) When assisting, advising, or consulting with a 4    veteran on an initial claim, receive compensation without 5    first memorializing the specific terms under which the 6    amount to be paid will be determined in a written 7    agreement signed by both parties. Compensation must be 8    purely contingent upon an increase in benefits awarded, 9    and if successful, compensation must not exceed 5 times 10    the amount of the monthly increase in benefits awarded 11    based on the claim. No initial or nonrefundable fee may be 12    charged by a person advising, assisting, or consulting 13    with a veteran on an initial claim.14        (10) When assisting, advising, or consulting with a 15    veteran on an initial claim for compensation, utilize 16    international call centers or data centers for processing 17    veterans' personal information.18        (11) When assisting, advising, or consulting with a 19    veteran on an initial claim for compensation, use a 20    veteran's personal log-in, username, or password 21    information to access that veteran's medical, financial, 22    or government benefits information.23        (12) When assisting, advising, or consulting with a 24    veteran on an initial claim for compensation, fail to 25    ensure that every individual who has access to the 26    veteran's medical or financial information undergoes a   HB3086- 11 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1    background check prior to having access to that 2    information. The background check must be conducted by a 3    reputable source and include identity verification and a 4    criminal records check.5(Source: P.A. 102-386, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 6103-783, eff. 1-1-25.)  HB3086- 12 -LRB104 06119 KTG 16152 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    330 ILCS 46/14    330 ILCS 46/55    330 ILCS 46/106    330 ILCS 46/157    330 ILCS 46/208    330 ILCS 46/259    330 ILCS 46/3010    330 ILCS 46/3511    330 ILCS 46/4012    330 ILCS 46/4513    330 ILCS 46/5014    815 ILCS 505/2YYY